Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 5

Violation of Ordinances, Laws and Regulations

7-3-501. Enforcement of ordinances, laws or regulations — Citations and warrants.

When any person violates an ordinance, law or regulation of a metropolitan government, any police or peace officer of such metropolitan government or any employee of the metropolitan government authorized to enforce such ordinance, law or regulation, in whose presence the violation is committed or who determines after investigation that there is probable cause such a violation has been committed, may issue a citation or civil warrant, giving a copy to the violator, showing the ordinance, law or regulation violated and the date, time and place when the violator is to appear in court.

Acts 1993, ch. 335, § 1.

7-3-502. Notice on citation or warrant.

Each citation or civil warrant issued pursuant to this part shall have printed on it, in large, conspicuous block letters, the following:

NOTICE: FAILURE TO APPEAR IN COURT ON THE DATE ASSIGNED BY THIS CITATION/WARRANT CAN RESULT IN: THE COURT ORDERING YOU TO PAY A CIVIL FINE/PENALTY, COURT COSTS AND LITIGATION TAXES TO THE METROPOLITAN GOVERNMENT; THE ISSUANCE OF AN EXECUTION AND GARNISHMENT TO COLLECT THE FINE/PENALTY, COSTS AND TAXES; AND THE ISSUANCE OF A BENCH WARRANT FOR YOUR ARREST FOR CONTEMPT OF COURT, WITH A PENALTY OF UP TO FIVE (5) DAYS IN JAIL AND/OR A FINE OF UP TO TEN DOLLARS ($10.00).

Acts 1993, ch. 335, § 2.

7-3-503. Service of citation or warrant.

If the police or peace officer or employee of a metropolitan government authorized to enforce such ordinance, law or regulation is unable to serve the citation or civil warrant issued pursuant to §7-3-501 at the time the ordinance, law or regulation is violated, the citation or civil warrant may be served by the police or peace officer or any employee of the metropolitan government authorized to enforce such ordinance, law or regulation or charged with the duty to serve civil or criminal process and who is at least eighteen (18) years of age. Service may be made by delivering a copy of the citation or civil warrant to the violator personally or, if the violator evades service, by leaving a copy of the citation or warrant at the violator's dwelling house or usual place of abode, with some person of suitable age and discretion then residing in the dwelling house or abode, whose name shall appear on the proof of service.

Acts 1993, ch. 335, § 3.

7-3-504. Service by mail.

Service by mail of a citation or civil warrant upon the violator may be made by any employee of a metropolitan government, by any additional plaintiff, or the violator's attorney, or by any person authorized by statute. The person serving the citation or civil warrant by mail shall send, postage prepaid, a copy of the citation or civil warrant to the violator by registered, return receipt, or by certified, return receipt mail. Service by mail shall not be the basis for the entry of a judgment by default unless the record contains a return receipt showing personal acceptance by the violator or by the violator's authorized agent.

Acts 1993, ch. 335, § 4.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

7-3-505. Failure to produce identification — Arrest — Release — Bond.

When any police or peace officer of a metropolitan government or any employee of a metropolitan government authorized to enforce ordinances, laws or regulations of the metropolitan government or charged with the duty to serve civil or criminal process, asks the violator for identification for the purpose of issuing a citation or civil warrant to that person, the failure to produce or give such identification shall be grounds for the violator to be arrested by an officer authorized to make arrests pursuant to title 40, chapter 7. In such event, the violator shall be arrested, transported to the police station or jail, booked, photographed and fingerprinted for identification purposes and, thereafter, shall be served with the citation or civil warrant and released from custody without being required to post a bond.

Acts 1993, ch. 335, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. A municipal officer may arrest a person for violation of a city code or ordinance when that person fails to provide the officer with proper identification, OAG 06-167 (11/9/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 187.

7-3-506. Injunctions and restraining orders.

Injunctions or restraining orders issued by any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce any ordinance, law or regulation of any metropolitan government or to restrain the violation of any ordinance, law or regulation of any metropolitan government shall not be stayed pending appeal, unless such stay is requested by motion in the court that issued the injunction and an appropriate bond approved by the court is posted. The court having issued the injunction or restraining order shall retain jurisdiction to consider such motion for a stay after an appeal has been filed. This section shall not be applicable in any proceeding where the procedure is governed by the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure or the Tennessee Rules of Criminal Procedure.

Acts 1993, ch. 335, § 6.

7-3-507. Penalties.

All metropolitan governments are empowered to set a penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) per day for each day during which the violation of ordinances, laws and regulations of such metropolitan government continues or occurs. No penalty in excess of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) may be imposed on any property owner who is charged with violating any ordinance, law or regulation relating to zoning or housing standards when the principal use of the property is for an owner-occupied residential dwelling and the appraised value of such property as shown on the records of the assessor of property does not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

Acts 1993, ch. 335, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal judge's imposition of penalty greater than $50 for ordinance violation, OAG 99-120, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 120 (5/17/99).

City courts are limited to monetary penalties against a parent in enforcing curfew violations, OAG 00-158, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (10/17/00).

7-3-508. Powers deemed additional and supplemental.

The powers conferred by this part are in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other laws, charter or home rule provision.

Acts 1993, ch. 335, § 8.

7-3-311. Courts and judicial functions.